Maryland, session 2026, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Authorized prescriber” means any licensed dentist, licensed dental hygienist
with prescriptive authority under § 4–206.4 of this article, licensed physician, licensed
podiatrist, licensed veterinarian, advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive
authority under Title 8 of this article, licensed nurse anesthetist, LICENSED
PSYCHOLOGIST WITH PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY UNDER TITLE 18, SUBTITLE 3B OF
THIS ARTICLE, or other individual authorized by law to prescribe prescription or
nonprescription drugs or devices.
12–102.
(e) (1) This title does not prohibit:
(i) A dentist, physician, nurse or midwife, or podiatrist from
administering a prescription drug or device in the course of treating a patient;
(ii) A licensed dental hygienist from administering medication under
§ 4–206.4 of this article; [or]
(iii) A nurse anesthetist from administering medication under §
8–513 of this article; OR
(IV) A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST FROM ADMINISTERING
MEDICATION UNDER TITLE 18, SUBTITLE 3B OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) For the purposes of paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection, “administering”
means the direct introduction of a single dosage of a drug or device at a given time, whether
by injection or other means, and whether in liquid, tablet, capsule, or other form.
18–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) (1) “Practice psychology” means to provide to any person:
(i) Any service for compensation involving the application of
psychological principles, psychological methods, or psychological procedures for
understanding, predicting, or influencing behavior, including the principles that relate to

HOUSE BILL 1021 3
learning, perception, motivation, emotions, organizational relationships, and interpersonal
relationships;
(ii) Any service for compensation involving the application of
psychological methods or psychological procedures for interviewing, counseling,
psychotherapy, behavior modification, or hypnosis; or
(iii) Any service for compensation involving the application of
psychological methods or psychological procedures for constructing, administering, or
interpreting tests of mental abilities, neuropsychological functioning, aptitudes, interests,
attitudes, personality characteristics, emotions, or motivations.
(2) “Practice psychology” includes:
(i) The application of psychological principles and psychological
methods in the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, and amelioration of psychological
problems, emotional conditions, or mental conditions of individuals or groups;
(ii) The use of psychological methods to assist an individual in
acquiring greater human effectiveness or to modify feelings, conditions, attitudes, or
behavior that is emotionally, intellectually, or socially ineffectual or maladjusted; [and]
(iii) The use of biofeedback instruments that do not pierce or cut the
skin to measure physical and mental functioning; AND
(IV) THE USE OF PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY AS AUTHORIZED
UNDER SUBTITLE 3B OF THIS TITLE.
(3) In this subsection, “psychological methods”, “psychological principles”,
and “psychological procedures” include the body of information that can be derived from a
graduate program in psychology, and other education or training recognized by the Board
as prerequisites for a license under this title, and that does not amount to the practice of
medicine.
18–302.
(a) To qualify for a license or registration, an applicant shall be an individual who
meets the requirements of this section.
(b) The applicant shall be of good moral character.
(c) The applicant shall be at least 18 years old.
(d) (1) Except as provided in this subsection, an applicant shall reside or
practice, or intend to reside or practice, in this State.

HOUSE BILL 1021
(2) The Board may issue a license or registration to an applicant who is
neither a resident of this State nor practicing in this State if the applicant shows that
issuing the license or registration would be in the interest of the citizens or government of
this State.
(e) The applicant shall submit to a criminal history records check in accordance
with § 18–302.1 of this subtitle.
(f) In addition to the other requirements of this section, to qualify to be a licensed
psychologist, an applicant must have:
(1) (i) A doctoral degree in psychology as defined in § 18–101(c)(1)(i) or
(iii) of this title; and
(ii) At least 2 years of professional, supervised experience in
psychology that is approved by the Board in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Board; or
(2) (i) A doctoral degree in psychology as defined in § 18–101(c)(1)(ii) of
this title;
(ii) Received a postdoctoral respecialization certificate from a
department of psychology that, at the time the certificate was issued, had a degree program
that was accredited by the American Psychological Association or the Canadian
Psychological Association and that included a minimum of 1,750 hours in a supervised
internship in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board; and
(iii) Completed a minimum of 1,500 hours of postcertification
advanced training hours or precertification hours of service as a registered psychology
associate in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
(h) (1) An applicant for a psychologist license shall successfully pass:
(i) A national examination in the practice of psychology; and
(ii) The State jurisprudence examination.
SUBTITLE 3B. PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY.
18–3B–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ADVISORY COMMITTEE” MEANS THE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY
ADVISORY COMMITTEE.

HOUSE BILL 1021 5
(C) “CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(D) “DRUG” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–101 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW
ARTICLE.
(E) “PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MEETS
THE REQUIREMENTS OF § 18–3B–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE AND IS CERTIFIED BY THE
BOARD TO USE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY.
(F) “PRESCRIPTION” MEANS AN ORDER FOR A DRUG, A LABORATORY TEST,
OR ANY MEDICINES, DEVICES, OR TREATMENTS, INCLUDING CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCES.
(G) (1) “PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY” MEANS THE AUTHORITY TO
PRESCRIBE, ADMINISTER, MODIFY, DISCONTINUE, OR DISTRIBUTE WITHOUT
CHARGE STARTER DOSAGES, DRUGS, OR CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES RECOGNIZED IN
OR CUSTOMARILY USED IN THE DIAGNOSIS, TREATMENT, AND MANAGEMENT OF
INDIVIDUALS WITH PSYCHIATRIC, MENTAL, COGNITIVE, NERVOUS, EMOTIONAL,
DEVELOPMENTAL, OR BEHAVIORAL DISORDERS.
(2) “PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY” INCLUDES:
(I) ISSUING ORAL, WRITTEN, OR ELECTRONIC PRESCRIPTIONS;
(II) IN CONJUNCTION WITH A PRESCRIPTION, THE ORDERING
OF LABORATORY TESTS, DIAGNOSTIC EXAMINATIONS, AND PROCEDURES
NECESSARY TO OBTAIN THE LABORATORY TESTS OR DIAGNOSTIC EXAMINATIONS;
AND
(III) OTHER PROCEDURES DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE SCOPE
OF PRACTICE OF PSYCHOLOGY AS DETERMINED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
BOARD.
18–3B–02.
(A) THERE IS A PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY ADVISORY COMMITTEE.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE IS TO ADVISE THE BOARD
ON OVERSIGHT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE CONSISTS OF:

HOUSE BILL 1021
(1) THREE LICENSED PSYCHOLOGISTS WHO CURRENTLY SERVE ON
THE BOARD;
(2) ONE LICENSED PHYSICIAN WHO CURRENTLY SERVES ON THE
STATE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS OR IS APPOINTED BY THE STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICIANS; AND
(3) ONE LICENSED PHARMACIST WHO CURRENTLY SERVES ON THE
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY.
(D) EACH MEMBER SHALL BE APPOINTED BY THE RESPECTIVE BOARD OF
EACH MEMBER.
(E) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) A MEMBER MAY BE REAPPOINTED.
(F) THE BOARD MAY REMOVE A MEMBER, AFTER A NOTICE AND A HEARING,
FOR INCAPACITY, INCOMPETENCE, NEGLECT OF DUTY, OR MALFEASANCE IN
OFFICE.
18–3B–03.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST SHALL BE CERTIFIED BY THE BOARD AS A PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST BEFORE THE LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST MAY USE PRESCRIPTIVE
AUTHORITY IN THE STATE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST WHO
HAS SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE
PSYCHOPHARMACOLOGY DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM.
18–3B–04.
(A) TO QUALIFY TO BECOME CERTIFIED AS A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST,
AN APPLICANT MUST:
(1) BE A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST IN GOOD STANDING WITH THE
BOARD;
(2) HAVE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED AN EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM
RECOGNIZED BY THE BOARD THAT INCLUDES:

HOUSE BILL 1021 7
(I) BASIC SCIENCE;
(II) FUNCTIONAL NEUROSCIENCES;
(III) PHYSICAL EXAMINATION;
(IV) INTERPRETATION OF LABORATORY TESTS;
(V) PATHOLOGICAL BASIS DISEASE;
(VI) CLINICAL MEDICINE;
(VII) CLINICAL NEUROTHERAPEUTICS;
(VIII) SYSTEMS OF CARE;
(IX) PHARMACOLOGY;
(X) CLINICAL PHARMACOLOGY;
(XI) PSYCHOPHARMACOLOGY;
(XII) PSYCHOPHARMACOLOGY RESEARCH;
(XIII) PROFESSIONAL, ETHICAL, AND LEGAL ISSUES; AND
(XIV) AT LEAST 30 HOURS OF DIDACTIC INSTRUCTION TO ENSURE
ACQUISITION OF THE NECESSARY KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS TO PRESCRIBE IN A SAFE
AND EFFECTIVE MANNER;
(3) HAVE SUCCESSFULLY COMPLETED A POSTDOCTORAL
PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGY FELLOWSHIP THAT INCLUDES AT LEAST 400 HOURS OF
PSYCHOPHARMACOLOGICAL TREATMENT OF AT LEAST 100 PATIENTS OF A DIVERSE
PATIENT POPULATION UNDER THE DIRECTION OF QUALIFIED PRACTITIONERS; AND
(4) HAVE PASSED:
(I) THE PSYCHOPHARMACOLOGY EXAMINATION FOR
PSYCHOLOGISTS OFFERED BY THE ASSOCIATION OF STATE AND PROVINCIAL
PSYCHOLOGY BOARDS; OR

HOUSE BILL 1021
(II) AN EXAMINATION DEVELOPED BY A NATIONALLY
RECOGNIZED BODY APPROVED BY THE BOARD.
(B) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE,
SHALL ESTABLISH A JOINT POLICY FOR THE RENEWAL OF THE LICENSE AND
CERTIFICATION OF A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST THAT REQUIRES THAT AT LEAST
20 HOURS OF THE CONTINUING EDUCATION INSTRUCTION REQUIRED FOR LICENSE
RENEWAL BE RELEVANT TO PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY.
(C) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COMMITTEE,
SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT PROCEDURES FOR REVIEWING EDUCATION AND
TRAINING CREDENTIALS FOR COMPLIANCE WITH CURRENT STANDARDS OF
PROFESSIONAL PRACTICE.
18–3B–05.
TO APPLY TO BECOME CERTIFIED TO USE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY, A
LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST SHALL SUBMIT A FORM AND EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SUBTITLE AS REQUIRED BY THE BOARD.
18–3B–06.
THE BOARD SHALL CERTIFY AS A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST ANY
APPLICANT WHO MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBTITLE.
18–3B–07.
(A) A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST MAY USE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY IN
THE STATE FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH WHOM THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST HAS
AN ESTABLISHED CLIENT OR PATIENT RECORD AT THE TIME THE PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST USES THE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY.
(B) A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST WHO USES PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY
SHALL:
(1) COORDINATE WITH THE PATIENT’S LICENSED MEDICAL
PROVIDER; AND
(2) MAKE AND DOCUMENT REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENCOURAGE
THE PATIENT TO MAINTAIN OR ESTABLISH A RELATIONSHIP WITH A LICENSED
MEDICAL PROVIDER.

HOUSE BILL 1021 9
(C) FOR EACH PRESCRIPTION ISSUED BY A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST,
THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST SHALL:
(1) ENSURE THAT THE PRESCRIPTION:
(I) COMPLIES WITH STATE AND FEDERAL LAW; AND
(II) IS IDENTIFIABLE AS BEING ISSUED BY THE PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE BOARD;
(2) DOCUMENT THE PRESCRIPTION IN THE PATIENT’S RECORD; AND
(3) AS APPLICABLE, REPORT THE PRESCRIPTION TO THE
PRESCRIPTION DRUG MONITORING PROGRAM IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 21,
SUBTITLE 2A OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(D) BEFORE A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST PRESCRIBES A CONTROLLED
SUBSTANCE, THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST SHALL FILE WITH THE BOARD:
(1) THE U.S. DRUG ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REGISTRATION NUMBER
OF THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST; AND
(2) THE MARYLAND STATE CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE
REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST.
(E) A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST MAY NOT DELEGATE PRESCRIPTIVE
AUTHORITY TO ANOTHER PERSON.
18–3B–08.
(A) A LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST MAY NOT USE PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY
UNLESS THE LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST IS CERTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) UNLESS CERTIFIED AS A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT USE THE WORDS OR TERM “PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST” WITH THE INTENT TO REPRESENT THAT THE PERSON IS A
PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST.
18–3B–09.
(A) THE BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS ON EACH PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST THAT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 1021
(1) THE NAME OF THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST;
(2) THE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST ASSIGNED BY THE BOARD;
(3) THE U.S. DRUG ENFORCEMENT AGENCY REGISTRATION NUMBER
AND MARYLAND STATE CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE REGISTRATION
NUMBER OF THE PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST, IF APPLICABLE; AND
(4) THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE CERTIFICATE ISSUED TO THE
PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST.
(B) (1) AT THE TIME THE BOARD CERTIFIES A PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, THE BOARD SHALL PROMPTLY TRANSMIT
THE INFORMATION LISTED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION FOR THE
PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST TO THE STATE BOARD OF PHYSICIANS AND THE
STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL PROMPTLY NOTIFY THE STATE BOARD OF
PHYSICIANS AND THE STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY IF THE BOARD REVOKES,
SUSPENDS, OR REINSTATES THE CERTIFICATION OR LICENSE OF A PRESCRIBING
PSYCHOLOGIST OR HAS A CERTIFICATION OR LICENSE REVOKED, SUSPENDED, OR
REINSTATED.
(C) (1) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT RULES AND REGULATIONS FOR
DENYING, MODIFYING, SUSPENDING, OR REVOKING THE CERTIFICATION OR
LICENSE OF A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST.
(2) THE BOARD MAY REQUIRE REMEDIATION OF ANY DEFICIENCIES
IN THE TRAINING OR PRACTICE PATTERN OF A PRESCRIBING PSYCHOLOGIST IF, IN
THE JUDGMENT OF THE BOARD, THE DEFICIENCIES COULD BE REASONABLY
EXPECTED TO JEOPARDIZE THE HEALTH, SAFETY, OR WELFARE OF THE PUBLIC.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.